Maine, session 132, LD1706.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §810, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Docketing of assignment of counsel. Assignment of competent defense counsel
pursuant to subsection 2 or 3 must be docketed within 24 hours of the assignment,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, if the defendant is incarcerated at the time of
the assignment.